Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 4

Merger of Municipalities

6-51-401. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Contiguous” means having a shared portion of boundary. In the case of more than two (2) municipalities, it means that each municipality must have a shared portion of boundary with at least one (1) of the other municipalities seeking to merge; and

“Municipality” or “municipalities” refers to incorporated cities and towns in this state.

Acts 1989, ch. 176, § 1.

6-51-402. Merger — Authorized.

Two (2) or more contiguous municipalities located in the same county may merge into one (1) municipality using the procedures in this part.

When municipalities are separated only by water, they shall be deemed contiguous for all purposes of this part if they are in the same county. After the municipalities merge, the water shall become a part of the consolidated municipality.

The merger, when complete, shall result in the creation and establishment of a new municipality.

Contiguous municipalities may be merged either as provided in § 6-51-403 or § 6-51-404.

Acts 1989, ch. 176, § 1.

6-51-403. Merger — By resolution and referendum.

The governing bodies of the municipalities wanting to merge may pass a joint resolution, or joint ordinance in the case of a proposed merger involving a home rule municipality, requesting a referendum in the municipalities to approve or disapprove a merger. The resolution must be passed by each of the governing bodies by a majority vote of the members to which the body is entitled. The resolution shall list the municipalities seeking to merge and state the name of the proposed consolidated municipality and under which charter it will operate: mayor-aldermanic, chapter 1 of this title; city manager-commission, chapter 18 of this title; or one (1) of the charters of the merging municipalities. The resolution may establish wards or districts for the consolidated municipality if the charter provides for wards or districts. A copy of the resolution, certified by the record keeper of each municipality, shall be forwarded to the county election commission or commissions if more than one (1) county is involved.

Upon receipt of the resolution, the county election commission or commissions shall call an election on the question of the merger in the municipalities as provided in the general election law. The election shall be held on the same day in each municipality. The question to be voted on shall appear on the ballot in substantially the following form:

Shall the of and the of merge and become one (1) municipality?

YES NO

If one (1) of the municipalities seeking to merge is a home rule municipality pursuant to the Constitution of Tennessee, article XI, § 9, all references in this section to “resolution” shall be deemed a reference to “ordinance.” The ordinance must indicate whether the non-home rule municipality wishes to adopt home rule and whether the home rule municipality wishes to abandon home rule. If the municipalities seeking to merge wish to adopt the home rule charter, the question appearing on the ballot in the non-home rule municipality shall be:

Shall this municipality adopt home rule and merge with the of and become one (1) municipality?

YES NO

If, on the other hand, the municipalities seeking to merge do not wish to adopt the home rule charter, the question appearing on the ballot in the home rule municipality shall be:

Shall this municipality abandon home rule and merge with the of and become one (1) municipality?

YES NO

If a majority of those voting in each municipality votes yes, the municipalities shall merge and become one (1) municipality one hundred twenty (120) days after the certification of the election results. If a majority of those voting in either municipality votes no, the municipalities shall remain separate entities.

Notwithstanding any restrictions or requirements of the charter of the consolidated municipality, during the one-hundred-twenty-day period after approval of a merger, but before it takes effect, the election commission or commissions shall call an election in the area of the consolidated municipality to elect the officials who are chosen by popular vote under the charter of the consolidated municipality. These officials shall take office on the date the merger takes effect and will serve in accordance with the charter.

Acts 1989, ch. 176, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1 of this title, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; a new chapter 1 was enacted by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

6-51-404. Merger — By petition and referendum.

Registered voters in each of the municipalities may petition for a referendum on the merger of the municipalities. The petition shall be signed by ten percent (10%) of the registered voters in each municipality. The petition shall list the municipalities seeking to merge and request a referendum on merging the municipalities, state the name of the proposed consolidated municipality, under which charter it will operate: mayor-aldermanic, chapter 1 of this title; city manager-commission, chapter 18 of this title; or one (1) of the charters of the merging municipalities, and may divide the proposed municipality into wards or districts if the charter provides for wards or districts. The petition shall be forwarded to the county election commission or commissions.

Upon receipt of the petition and its verification, the county election commission or commissions shall proceed as provided in § 6-51-403(b)(1) and (2). Section 6-51-403(b)(3) shall apply if the merger is approved.

Acts 1989, ch. 176, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1 of this title, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; a new chapter 1 was enacted by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

Attorney General Opinions. Electronic signatures on petitions for municipal formation and annexation. OAG 12-80, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (8/2/12).

6-51-405. Costs of referendum.

If the merger is authorized by referendum, the costs of the election shall be borne by the municipality formed by the merger. If the merger is defeated by referendum, the costs shall be borne by each municipality in the proportion its population bears to the total population of the municipalities in which the election was held. Population figures used shall be those from the latest determination of population by the department of economic and community development.

Acts 1989, ch. 176, § 1.

6-51-406. Continuation of ordinances.

Unless otherwise provided in the petition or resolution that initiated the merger, this subsection (a) shall govern the continuation of ordinances and the interpretation of existing ordinances.

All ordinances in force within the former municipalities at the time of the merger that are not in conflict with the consolidated municipality's charter or with the ordinances of the former municipality with the greater population according to the latest determination by the department of economic and community development shall remain in full force and effect until superseded or repealed by the governing body of the consolidated municipality.

All such ordinances, except franchise and other ordinances of only local effect, shall apply to the entire area of the consolidated municipality. In the case of different nonconflicting ordinances dealing with the same subject matter, the ordinance of the more populous municipality shall control.

Ordinances of the former municipalities that are in conflict with the charter of the merged municipality or the ordinances of the more populous municipality shall be deemed repealed as of the effective date of the merger.

Nothing in this subsection (a) shall be construed to discharge any person from liability, either civil or criminal, for any violation of any ordinance of any of the former municipalities incurred before the merger.

The petition or resolution initiating the merger may provide different terms for the continuation of ordinances and the interpretation of existing ordinances from those provided in subsection (a).

Acts 1989, ch. 176, § 1.

6-51-407. Property, rights and privileges.

All the property, rights and privileges of every kind vested in or belonging to either of the former municipalities shall be vested in and owned by the consolidated municipality.

Acts 1989, ch. 176, § 1.

6-51-408. Debts and liabilities — Bond funds.

All outstanding debts and liabilities of the former municipalities shall be assumed by the consolidated municipality.

All the territory included within the limits of the consolidated municipality shall be liable for the floating and bonded indebtedness, including interest, of all the territory included within the consolidated municipality.

Whenever at the time of the merger, however, any of the respective municipalities have on hand any bond funds voted for public improvements not already appropriated or contracted for, this money shall be kept in a separate fund and devoted to public improvements in the territory for which the bonds were voted.

Acts 1989, ch. 176, § 1.

6-51-409. State-shared taxes.

The consolidated municipality shall continue without interruption receiving state-shared taxes.

For state-shared taxes distributed on a population basis, the entire population of the consolidated municipality shall determine its share of the state revenue.

Acts 1989, ch. 176, § 1.

6-51-410. Part inapplicable.

This part shall not apply to counties having a metropolitan form of government.

Acts 1989, ch. 176, § 3.